Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1009
Board; contracts; enter into.

In carrying out the provisions of sections 46-1001 to 46-1020, the board of directors of any such rural water district is authorized to enter into contracts with agencies of the State of Nebraska or of the United States, or municipalities, for the obtaining of water service for use by the district or for furnishing the same for domestic or other uses.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 9, p. 752.